Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.88.040

Special election—Notification of auditors—Application of election laws.

The secretary of state shall promptly notify the county auditors of the date of the special election and certify to them the text of the ballot title for this special election. The general election laws shall apply to the election required by RCW 29A.88.020 to the extent that they are not inconsistent with this chapter. Statutory deadlines relating to certification, canvassing, and the voters' pamphlet may be modified for the election held pursuant to RCW 29A.88.020 by the secretary of state through emergency rules adopted under RCW 29A.04.611.

[ 2013 c 11 s 86; 2003 c 111 s 2204. Prior: 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 6. Formerly RCW 29.91.040.]